North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 1. Quarantine and Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 106-304.
Proclamation of livestock and poultry quarantine.

Upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture, it shall be lawful for the Governor to issue his proclamation forbidding the importation into this State of any and all kinds of livestock and poultry from any state where there is known to prevail contagious or infectious diseases among the livestock and poultry of such state.

History.

1915, c. 174, s. 1; C.S., s. 4871; 1969, c. 606, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to llamas, see

G.S. 106-22.4

.

§ 106-305.
Proclamation of infected feedstuff quarantine.

Upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture, it shall be lawful for the Governor to issue his proclamation forbidding the importation into this State of any feedstuff or any other article or material dangerous to livestock and poultry as a carrier of infectious or contagious disease from any area outside the State. This shall also include any and all materials imported for manufacturing purposes or for any other use, which have been tested by any state or federal agency competent to make such tests and found to contain living infectious and contagious organisms known to be injurious to the health of man, livestock and poultry.

History.

1915, c. 174, s. 2; C.S., s. 4872; 1953, c. 1328; 1969, c. 606, s. 1.

§ 106-306.
Rules to enforce quarantine.

Upon such proclamation being made, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have power to make rules and regulations to make effective the proclamation and to stamp out such infectious or contagious diseases as may break out among the livestock and poultry in this State.

History.

1915, c. 174, s. 3; C.S., s. 4873; 1969, c. 606, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to cattle and cattle diseases, see G.S. 106-22(3).

§ 106-307.
Violation of proclamation or rules.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the terms of the proclamation of the Governor, or any rule or regulation made by the Commissioner of Agriculture in pursuance thereof, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1915, c. 174, s. 4; C.S., s. 4874; 1969, c. 606, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 762; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-307.1.
Serums, vaccines, etc., for control of animal diseases.

The North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is authorized and empowered to purchase for resale serums, viruses, vaccines, biologics, and other products for the control of animal and poultry diseases. The resale of said serums, viruses, vaccines, biologics and other products shall be at a reasonable price to be determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1943, c. 640, s. 1; 1969, c. 606, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 49.

Cross References.

For North Carolina Biologics Law of 1981, see

G.S. 106-707

through 106-714.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section and

G.S. 106-307.2

to 106-307.6, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 323 (1943).

§ 106-307.2.
Reports of infectious disease in livestock and poultry to State Veterinarian.

All persons practicing veterinary medicine in North Carolina shall report promptly to the State Veterinarian the existence of any reportable contagious or infectious disease in livestock and poultry. The Board of Agriculture shall establish by rule a list of animal diseases and conditions to be reported and the time and manner of reporting.

The State Veterinarian shall notify the State Health Director and the Director of the Division of Public Health in the Department of Health and Human Services when the State Veterinarian receives a report indicating an occurrence or potential outbreak of anthrax, arboviral infections, brucellosis, epidemic typhus, hantavirus infections, murine typhus, plague, psittacosis, Q fever, hemorrhagic fever, virus infections, and any other disease or condition transmissible to humans that the State Veterinarian determines may have been caused by a terrorist act.

History.

1943, c. 640, s. 2; 1969, c. 606, s. 1; 2002-179, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 13.3(oo).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(oo), effective July 1, 2011, in subsection (b), substituted “Director of the Division of Public Health in the Department of Health and Human Services” for “Director of the Division of Environmental Health in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 106-307.3.
Quarantine of infected or inoculated livestock.

Hog cholera and other contagious and infectious diseases of livestock are hereby declared to be a menace to the livestock industry and all livestock infected with or exposed to a contagious or infectious disease may be quarantined by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Agriculture. All livestock that are inoculated with a product containing a living virus or other organism are subject to quarantine at the time of inoculation in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Agriculture: Provided, nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing anyone entitled to administer serum or vaccine under existing laws from continuing to administer same.

History.

1943, c. 640, s. 3; 1969, c. 606, s. 1.

Cross References.

For authority of State Veterinarian to quarantine, see

G.S. 106-401

.

§ 106-307.4.
Quarantine of inoculated poultry.

All poultry that are inoculated with a product containing a living virus or other organism capable of causing disease shall be quarantined at the time of inoculation in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Agriculture. Provided nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing anyone entitled to administer vaccines under existing laws from continuing to administer same.

History.

1969, c. 606, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to permit for sale, transportation, etc., of animals affected with disease, see

G.S. 106-400

.

§ 106-307.5.
Livestock and poultry brought into State.

All livestock and poultry transported or otherwise brought into this State shall be in compliance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Agriculture.

History.

1943, c. 640, s. 4; 1969, c. 606, s. 1.

§ 106-307.6.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any provisions set forth in

G.S. 106-307.1

to 106-307.5 or any rule or regulation duly established by the State Board of Agriculture shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1943, c. 640, s. 6; 1969, c. 606, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 763; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-307.7.
Diseased livestock running at large.

Whenever the State Veterinarian is informed or reasonably believes that certain livestock is infected with or has been exposed to any contagious or infectious disease, that such livestock is running at large and that such livestock cannot be captured with the exercise of reasonable diligence, the State Veterinarian shall have authority to direct the appropriate sheriff or other proper officer to destroy such livestock in a reasonable manner and such sheriff or other officer shall make diligent effort to destroy such livestock.

History.

1971, c. 676.